Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,175
Historical vehicles; prohibited acts; penalty.

It shall be unlawful to own or operate a motor vehicle or trailer with historical license plates in violation of section 60-3,130, 60-3,131, or 60-3,134. Upon conviction of a violation of any provision of such sections, a person shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 175;

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 34.